apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="п/іч__n">
  <e>       <p><l>іч</l>        <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іч</l>        <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іччю</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ече</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечей</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечам</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечами</l>     <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечах</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="мам/а__n">
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ів</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ів</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l>       <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="чи__part">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

</pardefs>

<e lm="чи">              <i>чи</i><par n="чи__part"/></e>
<e lm="ось">             <i>ось</i><par n="чи__part"/></e>
<e lm="би">              <i>би</i><par n="чи__part"/></e>
<e lm="піч">             <i>п</i><par n="п/іч__n"/></e>
<e lm="мама">            <i>мам</i><par n="мам/а__n"/></e>
